South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3265.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 32, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-32-25.  (A) Individualized education program teams shall consider the need for age-appropriate and developmentally appropriate instruction for the subjects taught under the comprehensive health education program when developing individualized education programs (IEPs) for children with disabilities. The department shall establish guidelines for the teams to use when carrying out the provisions of this section. (B) In developing IEPs for children with disabilities, in addition to any other requirements established by the State Board of Education, each district board shall ensure that IEP teams consider the guidelines established by the department pursuant to subsection (A). SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----